District of Columbia statutes.
34-1314.02

Commission rules and regulations.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit the Commission’s authorization under § 34-2802 to adopt rules and regulations consistent with the provisions of this chapter.

History

May 3, 2014, D.C. Law 20-102, § 402, 61 DCR 1882